Wisconsin, session 2025, AB211.
do enact as follows:AB211,1Section 1. 101.123 (3) (n) of the statutes is created to read:101.123 (3) (n) A tobacco bar that satisfies all of the following:1. The tobacco bar came into existence on or after June 4, 2009.2. Only the smoking of cigars and pipes is allowed in the tobacco bar.3. The tobacco bar is not a retail food establishment, as defined in s. 97.30 (1) (c).4. A notice that smoking of cigars and pipes is allowed on the premises is displayed in a conspicuous place in the tobacco bar.5. Persons under the age of 21 are prohibited from entering the tobacco bar premises.6. Every employee of the tobacco bar signs an acknowledgement that the employee will be subjected to secondhand smoke.7. The tobacco bar includes in an application for, or for the renewal of, a Class “B” or “Class B” license, in addition to the information required under s. 125.04 (3), building plan documents demonstrating that the tobacco bar’s premises have sufficient air filtration and exhaust. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab211 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab211 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB211 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB211 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB211: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting